Maine, session 132, LD797.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §1192, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 456, §18, is further
amended to read:
2. Has registered for work. The individual has registered for work at, and continued
to report at, an employment office in accordance with rules the commissioner adopts,
except that the commissioner may, by rule, waive or alter either or both of the requirements
of this subsection as to individuals attached to regular jobs and as to such other types of
cases or situations with respect to which the commissioner finds that compliance with the
requirements would be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purposes of this
chapter. A rule under this subsection may not conflict with section 1191, subsection 1.
The individual must actively seek work 3 times each week in which a claim for benefits is
filed unless the individual is participating in approved training under subsection 6 or work
search has been waived in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner and provide
evidence of work search efforts in a manner and form as prescribed by the Department of
Labor. Failure to provide required work search documentation results in a denial of
benefits in accordance with section 1194, subsection 2 for the week or weeks for which no
documentation was provided unless the department determines there is good cause for the
individual's failure to comply with this requirement;.
A. Acceptable work search efforts under this subsection include:
(1) Submitting a resume to an employer;
(2) Completing and submitting a job application to an employer or recruiter;
(3) Attending and completing an interview or skills test with an employer;
(4) Attending a job fair;
(5) Completing an online or in-person job search workshop or job club;
(6) Completing a job search assessment, including but not limited to a skills
assessment;
(7) Participating in a volunteer or on-the-job training opportunity likely to lead to
paid employment;
(8) Taking a civil service exam;
(9) Developing a complete resume in the State's employment services system;
(10) Completing career direction research or work, such as a job search plan or a
targeted employer list;
(11) Completing job search branding and marketing activities such as completing
a resume, cover letter or master application, creating an online professional
networking profile or uploading a completed resume to a job board, allowing
visibility to employers;
(12) Completing an online or in-person mock interview; and
(13) Participating in job search counseling.
B. Required evidence of work search efforts under this subsection must be submitted
to the Department of Labor each week via an online portal or by submitting a paper
Page 1 - 132LR2203(01)

411 form documenting such efforts to the Department of Labor, job center or other
422 designated office no later than 5 p.m. on the Friday of the week in which the work
433 search efforts were completed. Such a form must require the claimant to report the
444 following:
(1) The effort taken to fulfill each of the 3 weekly work search requirements;
(2) The employer, employment office, program or agency with which the claimant
interacted or educational program in which the claimant participated;
(3) The dates of the work search efforts; and
(4) A point of contact for each employer, employment office, program, agency or
educational program so the Department of Labor may verify each effort.
C. Prior to paying any weekly unemployment benefits to a claimant, the Department
of Labor shall verify that the claimant submitted the required weekly report of work
search efforts. Each week, the Department of Labor shall select a sample of at least
10% of all work search effort reports for random audits with employers, employment
offices or educational programs of reported work search efforts;
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §1192, sub-§13, as amended by PL 2023, c. 233, §1, is further
amended to read:
13. Reemployment services and eligibility assessment; participation. In the case
that the individual has been referred to reemployment services and eligibility assessment
by the Department of Labor, the individual participates in those services, unless the
department determines there is good cause for the individual's failure to participate. Failure
to participate in reemployment services and eligibility assessment without good cause
results in a denial of benefits until the individual participates; and
Sec. 3. 26 MRSA §1192, sub-§14, as amended by PL 2023, c. 233, §2, is repealed.